Hawaii, session 2026, SB380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to reclassify certain non-general funds of the department of accounting and general services to align their classifications with statutory definitions and the actual purposes for which the funds are used.  The reclassification is based on recommendations from auditor's report no. 23-17, which reviewed the department of accounting and general services' special funds, revolving funds, trust funds, and trust accounts and identified specific amounts that do not meet the criteria for their current classifications.  Reclassifying certain accounts as trust funds will ensure compliance with statutory requirements, enhance financial transparency, and improve the management and oversight of state resources.  Additionally, this Act is intended to streamline the department of accounting and general services' fund structure and promote public trust in the stewardship of the funds by addressing inconsistencies and ensuring that fund classifications accurately reflect their intended purposes. SECTION 2. The following trust accounts shall be reclassified as trust funds: (1)  The refundable deposits--public works--leasing branch trust account, administratively established in 2019; (2)  The refundable deposits--public works--other than leasing trust account, administratively established in 2019; (3)  The state foundation on culture and the arts trust account, administratively established in 1984; (4)  The temporary deposits--automotive management trust account, administratively established in 1996; and (5)  The temporary deposits--public works trust account, administratively established in 1988. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________